en: unshelled, in shell
da: med skal
pt: com casca, com cascas

en: scalding
da: skoldning, skoldet, skoldede
sv: skållning, skållat, skållad, skållade

en: pitted
bg: без костилка
de: entsteint, entsteinte, entsteinter, entsteintes, entkernt, entkernte, entkernter, entkerntes
fi: kivetön, kivettömät
fr: dénoyauté, dénoyautée, dénoyautés, dénoyautées
hr: bez koštice, bez sjemenki
hu: magozott, kimagozott, magtalanított
it: denocciolato, denocciolati, denocciolata, denocciolate
nl: ontpit, ontpitte
pl: drylowany, drylowana, drylowane, bez pestek
sv: urkärnad, urkärnat, urkärnade
uk: без кісточки, без кісточок

en: peel, peels, peel of
ca: pell de, pell d', escorça de, escorça d'
de: schale, schalen, schale von, schalen von
el: φλούδα
es: piel de, corteza de
fi: kuori, kuoret, kuorta
fr: écorce de, écorces de, écorces d'
hr: kora, korica, kora od
hu: héj, héja
it: scorza
nl: schil, schillen
pl: skórka z
pt: pele, peles, pele de, peles de, raspas
ro: piele de, coajă
uk: цедра

it: scorzette
nl: schilletjes

en: pulp, pomace, pressed pulp
bg: пулп, пулп от
ca: polpa, polpa de
cs: dřeň, dužina
da: frugtkød
de: mark, pulpe, fruchtfleisch
eo: Pulpo
es: pulpo, pulpa de, polpa del, Pulpa
fi: hedelmäliha
fr: pulpe, pulpe de, pulpe d', en pulpe
gl: Polpa
he: בקבוקון מיץ
hr: pulpa, komina, prešana pulp
hu: bél, velő
it: polpa, polpa di, polpa d'
ja: パルプ
nl: pulp, vruchtvlees
pl: pulpa, pulpa z, miąższ, miąższ z, miazga, miazga z
pt: polpa, polpas, polpa de, polpas de
sk: Dužnina
sv: fruktkött
uk: м'якоть, польпа, пульпа

ca: sense polpa
en: without pulp
bg: без пулпа
da: uden frugtkød
de: ohne Fruchtfleisch
es: sin pulpa
fi: ilman hedelmälihaa
fr: sans pulpe
hr: bez pulpe
hu: pulpa nélkül
it: senza polpa, senza polpe, senza polpa di, senza polpe di
nl: zonder pulp
pt: sem polpa, sem polpas, sem polpa de, sem polpas de
sv: utan fruktkött

en: sieved
ca: tamisat
de: passiert
es: tamizado, tamizados, tamizar, tamizada
fr: tamisé, tamisée, tamisés, tamisées, finement tamisé
hu: szitált
it: setacciato, setacciati, setacciata, setacciate
nl: gezeefd, gezeefde
pt: peneirado, peneirada, peneirados, peneiradas
uk: просіяний, просіяне, просіяна, просіяні, сіяний, сіяна, сіяне, сіяні

de: extrahiert, extrahierte, extrahierter, extrahiertes
es: extraído, extraída, extraídos, extraídas
fr: extrait, extraite, extraits, extraites
sv: extraherad, extraherat, extraherade

de: kaltextrahiert, kaltextrahierte, kaltextrahierter, kaltextrahiertes, kaltextrahierten, kaltextrahiertem
en: cold extracted
es: extracción en frío, extraído en frío, extraída en frío, extraídos en frío, extraídas en frío
fr: extraction à froid, extrait à froid, extraite à froid, extraits à froid, extraites à froid
it: estratto a freddo

en: juice, juices, juices of, juice from
az: şıresl
bg: сок, сок от
cs: šťáva, šťávy, šťáva z, štávy z
da: saft, juice
de: saft, säfte, saft von, säfte von, saft vom, säfte vom, direktsaft, direktsäfte
es: jugo, jugo de
fi: mehu
fr: jus de, jus d'
hr: sok, sok iz, sok od, voćni sok od, od soka, soka
hu: leve, lé
it: succo, succo di, succo d', succhi, succhi di, succhi d'
ja: ジュース, 果汁
lt: sultys, sulčių
nb: juice
nl: sap
nn: juice
pl: sok z, sok, sok ze, soku z, soków, soku, soków z
pt: suco, sucos, sumo, sumos, suco de, sucos de, sumo de, sumos de, em suco, em sumos
ro: suc de, suc
ru: сок
sk: stavy
sv: juice, saft, juice av
uk: сік

ca: suc, suc de, suc d'
es: zumo de, zumo

de: dicksaft, dicksäfte
nl: diksap

en: juice solids
ca: sòlids de suc
de: Saftfeststoffe
es: sólidos de jugo
fi: mehevät aineet
fr: solides de jus
hr: suhi dijelovi soka
pl: substancje stałe soku

en: soaked
fr: trempé, trempée, trempés, trempées
pl: namoczone
uk: мочений, мочена, мочене, мочені, вимочений, вимочена, вимочене, вимочені

en: with the germ removed
ca: amb el germen eliminat
de: mit entferntem Keim
es: con el germen eliminado
fi: poistetulla ituosalla
fr: avec le germe enlevé
hr: s uklonjenim klicom
it: con il germe rimosso
ja: 胚芽を取り除いた
nl: met de kiem verwijderd
pl: z usuniętym zarodkiem
pt: com o germe removido
ro: cu germenele îndepărtate
ru: с удаленным зародышем
sk: s odstráneným klíčkom
sv: med borttagen grodd

en: liquid
ca: líquid
da: flydende
de: flüssiger, flüssige
es: líquido, fluída
fi: nestemäinen
fr: liquide
hr: tekući, tekuća
it: liquido
ja: 液
nl: vloeibaar, vloeibare
pl: płyn, płyn z, masa z, masa, w płynie, płynny, płynna
uk: рідкий

en: concentrated, concentrate, concentrates
ar: مركز
bg: концентрат, концентрат от
bs: koncentrirana
ca: concentrat
da: koncentreret, koncentrat
de: konzentriert, konzentrierter, konzentrierte, konzentriertes, konzentrierten, konzentriertem eingedickt, konzentrat, konzentrate, einfach konzentriert
es: concentrado, concentrada, concentrados, concentradas
fa: کنسانتره
fi: tiivistetty, tiiviste, tiivisteitä, tiivistettä
fr: concentré, concentrée, concentrés, concentrées, concentré de
hr: iz koncentrata, koncentriran, koncentrirani, koncentrani, koncentrat, koncentrat za, koncentrati, od koncentrata, konc
hu: koncentrátum
it: concentrato, concentrato di, concentrato d', concentrati, concentrata, concentrate
ja: 濃縮
ko: 농축물
lt: koncentratas, koncentrato, koncentruotos, koncentruotų
lv: koncentrāts
mk: концентриран, концентрирана
nl: concentraten, concentraat, geconcentreerd, geconcentreerde
pl: koncentrat, koncentraty, koncentrat z, skoncentrowany, skoncentrowana, skoncentrowane, zagęszczony, zagęszczone, zagęszczona, zagęszczonych, zagęszczonego, zagęszczonej, koncentraty z
pt: concentrado, concentrada, concentrados, concentradas, concentrado de, concentrados de, concentratos
ro: concentrat de
ru: концентрированный
sl: zgoščeni
sr: Концентрат
sv: koncentrerad, koncentrat, koncentrat från, koncentrerade
uk: концентрат, концентрований, концентрована, концентроване, концентровані, концентрати

hr: koncentrat boje iz, koncentrat za bojenje iz
pl: barwiący koncentrat, koncentrat barwiący, koncentraty barwiące, barwiący koncentrat z, koncentrat barwiący z, koncentraty barwiące z

en: double concentrated
de: zweifach konzentriert, zweifach konzentrierte, zweifach konzentrierter, zweifach konzentriertes, 2 fach konzentriert, 2 fach konzentrierte, 2 fach konzentrierter, 2 fach konzentriertes, doppelt konzentriert, doppelt konzentrierte, doppelt konzentrierter, doppelt konzentriertes, 2-fach konzentriert, 2-fach konzentrierte, 2-fach konzentrierter, 2-fach konzentriertes
es: doble concentrado, doble concentrada
hr: dvostruki koncentrat
it: doppio concentrato, doppio concentrato di, doppio concentrato d'
pl: podwójnie skoncentrowany